Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,111
Permit to take paddlefish; issuance; fee.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the issuance of permits for the taking of paddlefish. The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than thirty-five dollars for residents. The fee for a nonresident permit to take paddlefish shall be two times the resident permit fee. In addition, the commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a nonrefundable application fee of not more than nine dollars. The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than twenty-four dollars for residents and not more than seventy-two dollars for nonresidents for the issuance of a preference point, in addition to any application fee. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for issuing a preference point. All fees collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Game Fund.

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 12;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 26;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 19;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 19.
July 18, 2026